North Carolina statutes. Chapter 123. Impeachment.
Article 3. Effect of Impeachment.

§ 123-12.
Accused suspended during trial.

Every officer impeached shall be suspended from the exercise of his office until his acquittal.

History.

1868-9, c. 168, s. 13; Code, s. 2934; Rev., s. 4634; C.S., s. 6255.

§ 123-13.
Manner of conviction; judgment; indictment.

No person shall be convicted on an impeachment without the concurrence of two thirds of the Senators present. Upon a conviction of the person impeached, judgment may be given that he be removed from office, or that he be disqualified to hold any office of honor, trust, or profit under this State, or both. Every person convicted on impeachment shall, nevertheless, be liable to indictment and punishment according to law.

History.

Const., art. 4, ss. 3, 4; 1868-9, c. 168, ss. 11, 12, 15; Code, ss. 2932, 2933, 2936; Rev., s. 4635; C.S., s. 6256.